Indiana, session 2026, HB1390.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-24-1-5.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.1. (a) This section applies to an offer to purchase
property under section 5 of this chapter that is made by the
Indiana department of transportation after June 30, 2026.
(b) The Indiana department of transportation must provide an
original offer to an owner that is equal to one hundred twenty-five
percent (125%) of the fair market value of the property, as
determined by the appraisal required under section 3(c)(2) of this
chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 32-24-1-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. A person having an
interest in property that has been or may be acquired for a public use
or damaged as a result of a public use without the procedures of this
article or any prior law followed is entitled to have the person's
damages assessed under this article substantially in the manner
provided in this article.
2026 IN 1390—LS 6794/DI 137